Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Child Care
199.8982.
Family child-care home certification program — When required — Requirements for certification — Unannounced inspection — Use of information — Authority to promulgate administrative regulations — Hearing — Emergency action — Training — Powers of local government in regulation of certified family child-care homes.

The cabinet shall establish a family child-care home certification program which shall be administered by the department. A family child-care provider shall apply for certification of the provider’s home if the provider is caring for four (4) to six (6) children unrelated to the provider. A family child-care provider caring for three (3) or fewer children may apply for certification of the provider’s home at the discretion of the provider. Applicants for certification shall not have been found by the cabinet or a court to have abused or neglected a child, and shall meet the following minimum requirements:
(1) (a)

The cabinet shall establish a family child-care home certification program which shall be administered by the department. A family child-care provider shall apply for certification of the provider’s home if the provider is caring for four (4) to six (6) children unrelated to the provider. A family child-care provider caring for three (3) or fewer children may apply for certification of the provider’s home at the discretion of the provider. Applicants for certification shall not have been found by the cabinet or a court to have abused or neglected a child, and shall meet the following minimum requirements:

Submit two (2) written character references;

Provide a written statement from a physician or advanced practice registered nurse that the applicant is in good health;

Submit to a criminal record check in accordance with KRS 199.8965;

Provide smoke detectors, a telephone, an adequate water supply, sufficient lighting and space, and a safe environment in the residence in which care is provided;

Provide a copy of the results of a tuberculosis risk assessment and the results of any appropriate follow-up with skin testing or chest X-ray for applicants who are determined to be at risk for developing tuberculosis in accordance with the recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention within thirty (30) days of the date of application for certification; and

Demonstrate completion of a total of at least six (6) hours of training in the following areas within three (3) months of application for certification:

Basic health, safety, and sanitation;

Recognizing and reporting child abuse; and

Developmentally appropriate child-care practice.

Initial applications for certification shall be made to the department. The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to establish fees that shall not exceed costs of the program to the cabinet, for proper administration of the certification. The department shall issue a certificate of operation upon inspecting the family child-care home and determining the provider’s compliance with the provisions of this section. The inspection shall be unannounced. A certificate of operation issued pursuant to this section shall not be transferable and shall be renewed every two (2) years for a fee that shall not exceed costs of the program to the cabinet for renewal.

A certified family child-care provider shall display the certificate of operation in a prominent place within the residence in which care is provided. The cabinet shall provide the certified family child-care provider with written information explaining the requirements for a family day-care provider and instructions on the method of reporting violations of the requirements which the provider shall distribute to parents.

Upon request of any person, the cabinet shall provide information regarding the denial, revocation, suspension, or violation of any type of day-care license of the family child-care provider. Identifying information regarding children and their families shall remain confidential.

The cabinet shall provide, upon request, public information regarding the inspections of and the plans of correction for the family child-care home within the past year. All information distributed by the cabinet under this paragraph shall include a statement indicating that the reports as provided under this paragraph from the past five (5) years are available from the family child-care home upon the parent’s, custodian’s, guardian’s, or other interested person’s request.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A which establish standards for the issuance, monitoring, release of information under this section and KRS 199.896 and 199.898, renewal, denial, revocation, and suspension of a certificate of operation for a family child-care home and establish criteria for the denial of certification if criminal records indicate convictions that may impact the safety and security of children in care. A denial, suspension, or revocation of a certificate may be appealed, and upon appeal an administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. If the cabinet has probable cause to believe that there is an immediate threat to the public health, safety, or welfare, the cabinet may take emergency action to suspend a certificate pursuant to KRS 13B.125. The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to impose minimum staff-to-child ratios. The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations relating to other requirements necessary to ensure minimum safety in family child-care homes. The cabinet shall develop and provide an “easy-to-read” guide containing the following information to a family child-care provider seeking certification of his home:

Certification requirements and procedures;

Information about available child-care training; and

Child-care food sponsoring organizations.

Family child-care providers shall annually demonstrate to the department completion of at least six (6) hours of training in child development. These hours shall include but are not limited to one and one-half (1.5) hours one (1) time every five (5) years of continuing education in the recognition and prevention of pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in KRS 620.020. Training in recognizing pediatric abusive head trauma may be designed in collaboration with organizations and agencies that specialize in the prevention and recognition of pediatric abusive head trauma approved by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. The one and one-half (1.5) hours of continuing education required under this section shall be included in the current number of required continuing education hours.

The cabinet shall, either through the development of or approval of, make available a model training curriculum and training materials, including video instructional materials, to cover the areas specified in subsection (1)(a)6. of this section. The cabinet shall develop or approve the model training curriculum and training materials to cover the areas specified in subsection (1)(a)6. of this section.

As used in this subsection “local government” means a city, county, charter county, urban-county government, consolidated local government, or unified local government.
(4) (a)

As used in this subsection “local government” means a city, county, charter county, urban-county government, consolidated local government, or unified local government.

The provisions of this section shall supersede all local government ordinances or regulations pertaining to the certification, licensure, and training requirements related to the operation of family child-care homes and no local government shall adopt or enforce any additional licensure, certification, or training requirements specifically applicable to family child-care homes in addition to those provided in this section. This subsection shall not be interpreted or construed to exempt family child-care homes from compliance with local government ordinances and regulations that apply generally within the jurisdiction.

Because the availability of adequate child-care as an essential business is vital to the Commonwealth’s state and local economies, by January 1, 2022, a local government that has adopted land use regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 100 shall specifically name family child-care homes in the text of its zoning regulations to authorize the board of adjustments to separately consider the applications of proposed family child-care homes for conditional use permits within the residential zones of the planning unit where they are not a fully permitted use pursuant to KRS 100.237.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 57, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 318, § 91, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 158, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 524, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 24, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 308, § 19, effective July 14, 2000; 2008, ch. 144, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 85, § 71, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 171, § 8, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 135, § 6, effective March 27, 2017; 2018 ch. 136, § 6, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 172, § 2, effective March 30, 2021.

199.8983.
Kentucky Child Care Advisory Council.

There is hereby created the Kentucky Child Care Advisory Council to be composed of eighteen (18) members. The members appointed by the Governor shall serve a term of three (3) years. The appointed members of the council shall be geographically and culturally representative of the population of the Commonwealth. For administrative purposes, the council shall be attached to the department. The members shall be as follows:

The commissioner of the department, or designee;

Four (4) members appointed by the Governor representing child-care center providers licensed pursuant to this chapter;

Two (2) members appointed by the Governor representing family child-care home providers licensed pursuant to this chapter;

Three (3) members appointed by the Governor who are parents, de facto custodians, guardians, or legal custodians of children receiving services from child-care centers or family child-care homes licensed pursuant to this chapter;

Three (3) members appointed by the Governor from the private sector who are knowledgeable about education, health, and development of children;

The director of the Division of Child Care within the department, or designee, as a nonvoting ex officio member;

The commissioner of education, Education and Workforce Development Cabinet, or designee, as a nonvoting ex officio member;

The executive director of the Governor’s Office of Early Childhood, or designee, as a nonvoting ex officio member;

The commissioner of the Department for Public Health within the cabinet, or designee, as a nonvoting ex officio member; and

The state fire marshal, Public Protection Cabinet, or designee, as a nonvoting ex officio member;

The council shall have two (2) co-chairpersons. One (1) co-chairperson shall be the commissioner of the department, or designee, and one (1) co-chairperson shall be elected by the voting members of the council.

Members shall serve until a successor has been appointed. If a vacancy on the council occurs, the Governor shall appoint a replacement for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Members shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary expenses in accordance with state travel expenses and reimbursement administrative regulations.

The council shall meet at least quarterly and at other times upon call of the co-chairpersons.

The council shall advise the cabinet on matters affecting the operations, funding, and licensing of child-care centers and family child-care homes. The council shall provide input and recommendations for ways to improve quality, access, and outcomes.

The council shall make an annual report by December 1 that provides summaries and recommendations to address the availability, affordability, accessibility, and quality of child care in the Commonwealth. A copy of the annual report shall be provided to the secretary, the Governor, the Legislative Research Commission, and the Child Welfare Oversight and Advisory Committee established in KRS 6.943.

HISTORY:
2015 ch. 49, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2018 ch. 159, § 53, effective July 14, 2018.

199.8984.
Child-Care Policy Council. [Repealed.]

199.899.
Market-rate survey to determine rates for child-care services receiving public funds.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall conduct a market-rate survey at least biennially to set the minimum rates paid by the cabinet for child-care services receiving public funds in the Commonwealth. The market-rate survey shall:

Survey all child-care programs in the Commonwealth licensed pursuant to KRS 199.896 or certified pursuant to KRS 199.8982;

Determine market rates; and

Make public its findings.

In counties containing no more than two (2) child-care programs of the same type regulated by the cabinet, the cabinet shall pay the rate charged by the program up to the maximum allowable market rate, set in accordance with federal regulations, paid to a program of the same type in that area development district.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall evaluate, at least annually, the adequacy of the child-care subsidy to enable low income families in need of child-care services to obtain child care.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 57, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 160, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 308, § 20, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 196, effective June 20, 2005.

199.8992.
Development of statewide network of community-based child-care resource and referral services — Awarding of contracts. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 57, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 161, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 308, § 21, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 197, effective June 20, 2005; repealed by 2020 ch. 36, § 44, effective July 15, 2020.

199.8994.
Uniform administration of child-care funds — Dedicated child-care licensing surveyors.

All child-day-care funds administered by the cabinet, including Title XX of the Social Security Act, shall be administered by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to the extent allowable under federal law or regulation and in a manner which is in the best interest of the clients to be served. To the extent permitted by federal law or regulations, requirements relating to application, eligibility, provider agreements, and payment for child-care services shall be the same regardless of the source of public funding.

The cabinet shall, to the extent allowable under federal law or regulation and in a manner which is in the best interest of the clients to be served, develop a system which provides a single intake point in each county through which parents seeking public subsidies for child-care services can make application.

The cabinet shall, subject to the extent funds are available, cooperate with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to fund and establish dedicated child-care licensing surveyor positions within the Division of Licensed Child Care to conduct all the cabinet’s child-care licensing activities. The cabinet shall have the authority to request the transfer of funds to establish these positions. Where possible, dedicated child-care surveyors shall have expertise or experience in child-care or early childhood education.

The targeted ratio of dedicated child-care licensing surveyor positions shall be one (1) surveyor for each fifty (50) child-care facilities in order to allow for the provision of an expedient, constructive, and thorough licensing visit.

The cabinet shall, in cooperation with the Division of Licensed Child Care, Cabinet for Health and Family Services, provide appropriate specialized training for child-care surveyors.

The cabinet shall evaluate ways to improve the monitoring of unregulated child-care providers that receive a public subsidy for child care, and promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that establish minimum health and safety standards, limitations on the maximum number of children in care, training requirements for a child-care provider that receives a child-care subsidy administered by the cabinet, and criteria for the denial of subsidies if criminal records indicate convictions that impact the safety and security of children in care.
(6) (a)

The cabinet shall evaluate ways to improve the monitoring of unregulated child-care providers that receive a public subsidy for child care, and promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that establish minimum health and safety standards, limitations on the maximum number of children in care, training requirements for a child-care provider that receives a child-care subsidy administered by the cabinet, and criteria for the denial of subsidies if criminal records indicate convictions that impact the safety and security of children in care.

If the cabinet has probable cause to believe that there is an immediate threat to the public health, safety, or welfare, it may take emergency action to deny a public subsidy for child-care services under KRS 13B.125.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 57, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 162, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 308, § 22, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 81, § 2, effective June 21, 2001; 2005, ch. 99, § 198, effective June 20, 2005.

199.8996.
Reports on child-care program activity.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall prepare the following reports on child-care programs, and shall make them available upon request:

State and federally mandated reports on the child-care funds administered by the Department for Community Based Services; and

Reports on the child-care subsidy programs, training, resource and referral, and similar activities upon request by the public, the Early Childhood Advisory Council, or the Child Care Advisory Council, to the extent resources are available within the cabinet and as permitted under the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884, and state and federal laws governing the protection of human research subjects.

The cabinet shall include the number of dedicated child-care licensing surveyor positions and the ratio of surveyors to child-care facilities within its half-year block grant status reports.

By November 1, 2017, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and the Early Childhood Advisory Council shall report to the Interim Joint Committee on Education and the Interim Joint Committee on Health and Welfare on recommendations and plans for sustaining the quality-based graduated early care and education program after the depletion of federal Race to the Top-Early Learning Challenge grant funds.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 57, § 9, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 163, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 308, § 23, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 199, effective June 20, 2005; 2013, ch. 57, § 5, effective June 25, 2013; 2015 ch. 16, § 4, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 80, § 54, effective June 29, 2017.